test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-3lex_sajos_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - sajos: # MLO, ok
    sajos+N+Sg+Nom: sajos
    sajos+N+Sg+Gen: saijoos
    sajos+N+Sg+Acc: saijoos
    sajos+N+Sg+Ill: sajosân
    sajos+N+Sg+Loc: sajosist
    sajos+N+Sg+Com: sajosáin
    sajos+N+Sg+Abe: saijoosttáá
    sajos+N+Ess: sajosin
    sajos+N+Par: sajosid
    sajos+N+Pl+Nom: sajoseh
    sajos+N+Pl+Gen: sajosij
    sajos+N+Pl+Acc: sajosijd
    sajos+N+Pl+Ill: sajosáid
    sajos+N+Pl+Loc: sajosijn
    sajos+N+Pl+Com: [sajosijguin, sajosijgijn]
    sajos+N+Pl+Abe: sajosijttáá
